District of Columbia statutes.
47-4001

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“District” means the District of Columbia.

(2)

“Children at risk” means persons under 18 years of age who have had direct or indirect contact with drugs.

(3)

“Drug prevention” means a program designed to promote positive self-worth and stress the importance of the avoidance of drug and alcohol consumption.

(4)

“Fund” means the Public Fund established in § 47-4002, which is responsible for investment and distribution of the funds generated by the tax check-off.

(5)

“Tax check-off” means the drug prevention and children at risk tax check-off system established in § 47-1812.11b.

Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-246, § 2, 38 DCR 371
Nov. 20, 1993, D.C. Law 10-56, § 10, 40 DCR 7222
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-236, § 2(d), 46 DCR 660
Income and franchise taxes, tax check-off, “drug prevention”, “children at risk,” “Fund” and “tax check-off” have meanings from this section, see § 47-1812.11b.
This section is referenced in § 47-1812.11b.
1981 Ed., § 47-4001.